Mississippi, session 2026, HB4037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  The governing authorities of the City of Greenwood, Mississippi, by ordinance duly spread upon its minutes, are authorized, in their discretion, to establish a Vacant and Abandoned Structures Registration Program in the city.  Structures included in such program shall include vacant and abandoned residential and nonresidential properties that contribute to blight, property decay, crime, declining property values, safety hazards for first responders and the public, which hinder economic development and neighborhood revitalization within the city.  The program shall be for the promotion of public health, safety and welfare within the corporate limits of the City of Greenwood. (2)  The program authorized under subsection (1) of this section shall identify and require the registration of vacant and abandoned structures, which include residential and nonresidential properties, ensure their maintenance in compliance with applicable codes, protect first responders through the provision of building plans, require proof of insurance, establish fees and penalties for noncompliance and encourage the timely rehabilitation or redevelopment of such properties to reduce blight and support community reinvestment. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.